District of Columbia statutes.
38-2952

Financial Management Task Force.

(a)

There is established a Financial Management Task Force (“Task Force”) with the purpose of serving as a collaborative body of District agencies that will support and assist in implementing financial management reform within the District of Columbia Public Schools.

(b)

Specific functions of the Task Force shall include the following:

(1)

Within 60 days of the approval of the Board of Education pursuant to § 38-2951(b), adopt by a majority vote the Reform Plan developed pursuant to § 38-2951(a);

(2)

Convene monthly, or more frequently as deemed necessary and appropriate, to report on the progress of, identify obstacles to, and recommend amendments to, the Reform Plan;

(3)

Identify ways that better coordinate and improve financial management service delivery; and

(4)

Assist with the implementation of the Reform Plan to ensure that the Reform Plan is executed in an appropriate and timely manner.

(c)

(1)

The Task Force shall be comprised of the following 8 voting members, or designees thereof, as follows:

(A)

The Mayor of the District of Columbia;

(B)

The Chair of the Committee on Education, Libraries and Recreation of the Council;

(C)

The Chair of Committee of Finance and Revenue of the Council;

(D)

The President of the Board of Education;

(E)

The District of Columbia Public Schools Superintendent;

(F)

The State Education Officer of the District of Columbia;

(G)

The Chief Financial Officer for the District of Columbia; and

(H)

The Chief Financial Officer for the District of Columbia Public Schools.

(2)

The following persons shall serve as advisory, nonvoting members of the Task Force:

(A)

All the members of the Council’s Committee on Education, Libraries and Recreation;

(B)

The department head or designee of the Office of Financial Management;

(C)

The department head or designee of the Committee on Financial Management and Student Services for the Board of Education;

(D)

The department head or designee of the Office of the Attorney General; and

(E)

The representative of the State Advisory Panel on Financial Management in the District of Columbia;

(3)

The Task Force shall be co-chaired by the Mayor, the Chair of the Committee on Education, Libraries and Recreation of the Council, and the President of the Board of Education.

(4)

The Director of the State Education Office shall provide staffing for the Task Force.

(d)

The voting members of the Task Force shall adopt and sign a Memorandum of Understanding binding their respective agencies regarding the implementation of the Reform Plan.

(e)

The Task Force shall terminate upon the full execution of the Memorandum of Understanding referred in subsection (d) of this section.

Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-211, § 5, 51 DCR 8805